Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
329D]

MEDICAL
MARIJUANA DISPENSARY SYSTEM

Section

329D-1 Definitions

329D-2 Medical marijuana dispensaries; authorized;
licensure

329D-3 Qualifications for licensure

329D-4 Medical marijuana dispensaries; license
application

procedure and verification; fees

329D-5 Medical marijuana dispensaries; selection

329D-6 Dispensary operations

329D-7 Medical marijuana dispensary rules

329D-8 Laboratory standards and testing;
laboratory

certification

329D-9 Manufacturing of medical marijuana
products

329D-10 Types of manufactured marijuana products

329D-11 Advertising and packaging

329D-12 Background checks

329D-13 Qualifying patients and primary
caregivers; dispensing

limits; other states

329D-14 Prohibited acts related to exceeding
limits; fraud;

penalties

329D-15 Criminal offense; unauthorized access to
retail

dispensing location

329D-16 Criminal offense; unauthorized access to
production

centers

329D-17 Prohibition of distribution of medical
marijuana and

medical marijuana products to minors;
penalties

329D-18 Diversion from dispensary or production
center;

penalties

329D-19 Criminal offense; alteration or
falsification of

medical marijuana dispensary records

329D-20 Law enforcement access to dispensary and
production

center records

329D-21 Revocation and suspension of licenses

329D-22 Medical marijuana zoning

329D-23 Annual inspections, audits, and reports

329D-24 Cultivation of medical marijuana by
qualifying

patients and primary caregivers

329D-25 Coordination among state and federal
agencies

329D-26 Public education

329D-27 Administrative rules

Note

Implementation report and informational briefing (not later
than March 15, 2016). L 2015, c 241, §13.

Personnel and contracts, exemption from chapter 76 (July 1,
2015 to June 30, 2017). L 2015, c 241, §14.

Repayment plan and schedule for deposits into medical
marijuana registry and regulation special fund (not later than July 1, 2017).
L 2015, c 241, §12.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next